Vermont statutes. Title 30 Public Service
Subchapter 1. General Powers
§ 249a.
Campground submetering.

Notwithstanding the provisions of section 249 of this title or any other provision of this title, a person operating a recreational campground may provide submetered electric service to campground users on a nonprofit basis, if such service is provided in accordance with rules adopted by the Commission, including rules relating to notice of rates and charges, accuracy of electrical submeters, and reasonable billing and complaint procedures.

HISTORY:

Added

1995, No. 182

(Adj. Sess.), § 18, eff. May 22, 1996.

§ 250.
Application; maps.

Within six months after July 1, 1970, or at such later date as the Public Utility Commission may establish, each company engaged in the distribution of electrical energy in the State shall apply to the Commission for a service territory consisting of the distribution area served by it on July 1, 1970, and any areas not presently served by it or any other electric utility company which it believes it is entitled to serve.
After consideration of the factors set forth in section 249 of this title, the Commission shall establish the service territory of each company.
The service territory thus established shall be defined on a map or maps approved by the Commission.
In the event applications under this section are filed by more than one electric company for an area, the Commission shall, after notice and hearing, determine what part of the area as to which competing claims are filed should be awarded to the respective applicants.
In the event the distribution facilities of the competing applicants are so intertwined or commingled as to make establishment of exclusive service territories impracticable, the Commission may authorize two or more companies which have filed competing applications to serve the area in conflict, subject to the provisions of section 251 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 251.
Areas served by several companies.

In any area which two or more companies distributing electrical energy are authorized to serve, a company shall not construct or extend its facilities, or furnish or offer to furnish its service to any person or property presently served by another public utility, without the written consent of the other public utility, or unless the Public Utility Commission, after notice and hearing, finds and determines that the service rendered by the serving public utility is inadequate and is not likely to be made adequate.

In the event service is requested for premises in an area which two or more companies distributing electrical energy are authorized to serve and have facilities available for service to the property, the public utility company the existing service facilities of which are nearest the metering point on the premises to be served shall, subject to the other applicable provisions of this section, be entitled to serve the premise.

In the event that service is requested for premises not within the service territory of any company, and if more than one other public utility is available for service to the property, the public utility whose existing service facilities are nearest the metering point on the premises to be served shall, subject to the other applicable provisions of this section, be entitled to serve said premises.

A company shall not construct or extend its facilities or furnish or offer to furnish its services to premises within the service territory of another company without being requested to do so by the company in whose territory the premises are located, or unless the Public Utility Commission, upon petition of the person served or to be served, after notice and hearing, finds and determines that the service rendered by such public utility in whose territory and premises are located is inadequate and will not be likely to be made adequate.

In resolving any dispute under subsections (b), (c), and (d) of this section, the Commission shall consider the factors set forth in section 249 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.

§ 252.
Experts, payment of expense.

The Public Utility Commission may employ technical and professional assistance as may be required in making the service territory determinations under sections 249-251 of this title and may allocate equitably that portion of the expense to the company or companies involved.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 257

(Adj. Sess.), § 6.

§ 253.
National Environmental Policy Act review.

The Governor may authorize a State agency, including the Public Utility Commission, to participate as a lead agency or a cooperating agency in any environmental review pursuant to the provisions of the National Environmental Policy Act of 1969, as amended, of any natural gas facility, as defined in subdivision 248(a)(3) of this title, which is to be located in Vermont and which requires a federal approval pursuant to the Natural Gas Act.

HISTORY:

Added

1987, No. 273

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. June 21, 1988.

§ 254.
Construction or extended operation of nuclear plant; public engagement process.

Timelines for approval.

Any petition for approval of construction of a nuclear energy generating plant within the State, or any petition for approval of the operation of a nuclear energy generating plant beyond the date established in a certificate of public good issued under this title, must be submitted to the Public Utility Commission no later than four years before the date upon which the approval may take effect.

Upon receipt of a petition for approval of construction or operation as provided under this section, the Public Utility Commission shall notify the General Assembly of that fact. The Department of Public Service with the review of the Joint Energy Committee, is authorized and directed to arrange for studies to be conducted as appropriate to support the General Assembly in the fact finding and public engagement process established in subsection (b) of this section.

Upon completion of the studies, the Department of Public Service shall provide the studies to the Public Utility Commission and to the Senate Committees on Finance and on Natural Resources and Energy and the House Committees on Commerce and Economic Development and on Energy and Technology, together with other information requested by the General Assembly.

Public engagement and fact-finding.

The objectives of the studies to be arranged by the Department of Public Service with the review of the Joint Energy Committee and the objectives of the public engagement process as a whole shall be:

to facilitate public discussion of long-term economic and environmental issues relating to the operation of any nuclear facility in the State;

to identify and assess the potential need for the operation of the facility and its long-term economic and environmental benefits, risks, and costs; and

to assess all practical alternatives to those set forth in the applicant’s petition that may be more cost-effective or that otherwise may better promote the general welfare.

The studies arranged by the Department in consultation with the Joint Energy Committee and the public engagement process, in general, shall:

identify, collect information on, and provide analysis of long-term accountability and financial responsibility issues, such as:

funding plans for guardianship of nuclear waste after licensure but before removal of nuclear waste from the site;

closure obligations, dates of completion, and assurance of funds to secure fulfillment of those closure obligations;

federal obligations and assurance of funds to provide for any undischarged federal responsibilities;

funding for emergency management requirements and evacuation plans before and after plant closure; and

any other financial responsibility related to any periods in which the facility is out of service.

identify, collect information on, and provide analysis of long-term environmental, economic, and public health issues, including issues relating to dry cask storage of nuclear waste and decommissioning options.

identify, collect information on, and provide analysis of current economic issues, in light of the fact that the operation of the nuclear energy generating plant beyond the date permitted in any previous certificate of public good is to be evaluated under present day cost-benefit assumptions and analyses and not as an extension of the cost-benefit assumptions and analyses forming the basis of the previous certificate of public good for the operation of the facility.

In conducting its part of the public engagement process, the Department shall conduct no less than three public meetings. The meetings shall be at separate locations within the State, in proximity to the nuclear energy generating facilities involved as well as in other locations as determined by the Department, and each shall be noticed by at least two advertisements, each occurring between one and three weeks prior to the meetings, in newspapers having general circulation within the State and within the municipalities in which the meetings are to be held. Copies of the notices shall be provided to the Public Utility Commission, the General Assembly, the Agency of Natural Resources, the Department of Health, the Agency of Transportation, the Attorney General, and each retail electricity provider within the State. During this public engagement and fact-finding process, the Department shall have authority to retain expert witnesses, counsel, advisors, stenographic, and other research assistance it may require. The Department may compensate the same and allocate related costs, as well as the costs of procuring the studies, to the owner of the Vermont Yankee nuclear power station, in the same manner authorized for personnel in particular proceedings under sections 20 and 21 of this title. The Department shall prepare a report of the proceedings containing a discussion of the principal contentions made by members of the public, analyses by any expert witnesses or consultants retained by the Department, presentations by any State agency and by any utility, and shall provide the same to the members of the Senate Committees on Finance and on Natural Resources and Energy and the House Committees on Commerce and Economic Development and on Energy and Technology, and to the public.

The public engagement and fact finding process set forth in this section may be held in conjunction with or separately from the statewide public engagement process on energy planning to be conducted by the Department pursuant to the Energy Security and Reliability Act.

The General Assembly shall conduct proceedings it deems appropriate in order to complete the fact finding and public engagement process.

Public Utility Commission action. In acting on a petition subject to this section, the Commission shall consider the objectives of the studies to be arranged by the Department, the objectives of the public engagement process as a whole, and the general and specific issues that the studies are required to address, as specified in subsection (b) of this section.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 160

(Adj. Sess.), § 4; amended

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 173c.

§ 254a.
Joint Fiscal Committee; nuclear energy analysis.

The Joint Fiscal Committee may authorize or retain services or resources to assist the General Assembly:

in any legislative proceeding under or related to subsection 248(e) of this title or 10 V.S.A. chapter 157; or

with respect to any proceedings before any State or federal court concerning a nuclear generating plant in the State and related issues.

Persons retained pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall work under the direction of a special committee consisting of the Chairs of the House Committees on Energy and Technology and on Natural Resources, Fish, and Wildlife and the Senate Committee on Natural Resources and Energy and the Joint Fiscal Committee.

The Public Utility Commission shall allocate expenses incurred pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to the applicant or the company or companies involved and such allocation and expense may be reviewed by the Public Utility Commission pursuant to section 21 of this title.

HISTORY:

Added

2011, No. 47

, §§ 20p, 20q, eff. May 25, 2011; amended

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 173d.

§ 255.
Regional coordination to reduce greenhouse gases.

Legislative findings. The General Assembly finds:

There is a growing scientific consensus that the increased anthropogenic emissions of greenhouse gases are enhancing the natural greenhouse effect, resulting in changes in the earth’s climate.

Climate change poses serious potential risks to human health and terrestrial and aquatic ecosystems globally, regionally, and in Vermont.

A carbon constraint on fossil fuel-fired electricity generation and the development of a CO2 allowance trading mechanism will create a strong incentive for the creation and deployment of more efficient fuel-burning technologies, renewable resources, and end-use efficiency resources and will lead to lower dependence on imported fossil fuels.

Absent federal action, a number of states are taking actions to work regionally to reduce power sector carbon emissions.

Vermont has joined with at least six other states to design the Regional Greenhouse Gas Initiative (RGGI), and, in 2005, Vermont’s Governor signed a memorandum of understanding (MOU) signaling Vermont’s intention to develop rules and programs to participate in RGGI.

It is crucial to manage Vermont’s implementation of RGGI and its consumption of fossil fuels for residential and commercial heating, and industrial processes, so as to maximize the State’s contribution to lowering carbon emissions while:

minimizing impacts on electric system reliability and unnecessary costs to Vermont energy consumers; and

minimizing the costs and the emissions resulting from the use of petroleum-based fuels for space heating and process heating for residential, commercial, and industrial purposes.

The accelerated deployment of low-cost process, thermal, and electrical energy efficiency, the strategic use of low- and zero-carbon generation, and the selective use of switching fuel sources are the best means to achieve these goals.

It is crucial that funds made available from operation of a regional carbon credits cap and trade system be devoted to the benefit of Vermont energy consumers through investments in a strategic portfolio of energy efficiency, weatherization, and low-carbon generation resources.

Cap and trade program creation.

The Agency of Natural Resources and the Public Utility Commission shall, through appropriate rules and orders, establish a carbon cap and trade program that will limit and then reduce the total carbon emissions released by major electric generating stations that provide electric power to Vermont utilities and end-use customers.

Vermont rules and orders establishing a carbon cap and trade program shall be designed so as to permit the holders of carbon credits to trade them in a regional market proposed to be established through the RGGI.

Allocation of tradable carbon credits.

The Secretary of Natural Resources, by rule, shall establish a set of annual carbon budgets for emissions associated with the electric power sector in Vermont that are consistent with the 2005 RGGI MOU, including any amendments to that MOU and any reduced carbon cap resulting from a subsequent program review by RGGI, and that are on a reciprocal basis with the other states participating in the RGGI process.

In order to provide the maximum long-term benefit to Vermont consumers, particularly benefits that will result from accelerated and sustained investments in energy efficiency and other low-cost, low-carbon power system, building envelope, and other investments, the Public Utility Commission, by rule or order, shall establish a process to allocate 100 percent of the Vermont statewide budget of tradable power sector carbon credits to one or more trustees acting on behalf of consumers in accordance with the following principles. To the extent feasible, the allocation plan shall accomplish the following goals:

minimize windfall financial gains to power generators as a result of the operation of the cap and trade program, considering both the costs that generators may incur to participate in the program and any power revenue increases they are likely to receive as a result of changes in regional power markets;

employ an administrative structure that will enable program managers to perform any combination of holding, banking, and selling carbon credits in regional, national, and international carbon credit markets in a financially responsible and market-sensitive fashion, and provide funds to defray the reasonable costs of the program trustee or trustees and Vermont’s pro rata share of the costs of the RGGI regional organization;

optimize the revenues received from the management and sale of carbon credits for the benefit of Vermont energy consumers and the Vermont economy;

minimize any incentives from operation of the cap and trade program for Vermont utilities to increase the overall carbon emissions associated with serving their customers;

build upon existing regulatory and administrative structures and programs that lower power and heating costs, improve efficiency, and lower the State’s carbon profile while minimizing adverse impacts on electric system reliability and unnecessary costs to Vermont energy consumers, and minimizing the costs and the emissions resulting from the use of petroleum-based fuels for space heating and process heating for residential, commercial, and industrial purposes;

ensure that carbon credits allocated under this program and revenues associated with their sale remain public assets managed for the benefit of the State’s consumers, particularly benefits that will result from accelerated and sustained investments in energy efficiency and other low-cost, low-carbon power, or heating system or building envelope investments;

where practicable, support efforts recommended by the Agency of Natural Resources or the Department of Public Service to stimulate or support investment in the development of innovative carbon emissions abatement technologies that have significant carbon reduction potential.

Appointment of consumer trustees. The Public Utility Commission, by rule, order, or competitive solicitation, may appoint one or more consumer trustees to receive, hold, bank, and sell tradable carbon credits created under this program. Trustees may include Vermont electric distribution utilities, the fiscal agent collecting and disbursing funds to support the statewide efficiency utility, or a financial institution or other entity with the expertise and financial resources to manage a portfolio of carbon credits for the long-term benefit of Vermont energy consumers. The net proceeds above costs from the sale of carbon credits shall be deposited into the Electric Efficiency Fund established under subdivision 209(d)(3) of this title. These funds shall be used by the entity or entities appointed under subdivision 209(d)(2)(B) of this title to help meet the building efficiency goals established under

10 V.S.A. § 581

by delivering heating and process-fuel energy efficiency services to Vermont consumers who use such fuel.

Reports. On or before January 15 of each year, commencing in 2007, the Department of Public Service in consultation with the Agency of Natural Resources and the Public Utility Commission shall provide to the House Committees on Commerce and Economic Development, on Energy and Technology, and on Natural Resources, Fish, and Wildlife and the Senate Committees on Finance and on Natural Resources and Energy a report detailing the implementation and operation of RGGI and the revenues collected and the expenditures made under this section, together with recommended principles to be followed in the allocation of funds. The provisions of

2 V.S.A. § 20(d)

(expiration of required reports) shall not apply to the report to be made under this subsection.

State action offsets. The State’s negotiators to RGGI shall advocate for and negotiate to adjust the rules of the program, as needed, so that greenhouse gas reductions resulting from State investments and other public investments and investments required by State law will not be prohibited from being eligible for offsets under the program.

HISTORY:

Added

2005, No. 123

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2007, No. 92

(Adj. Sess.), § 18;

2007, No. 209

(Adj. Sess.), § 13b;

2009, No. 54

, § 105, eff. June 1, 2009;

2009, No. 1

(Sp. Sess.), § E.235.2, eff. June 2, 2009;

2011, No. 47

, § 20c, eff. May 25, 2011;

2013, No. 50

, § E.700;

2013, No. 89

, § 4;

2013, No. 142

(Adj. Sess.), § 50;

2017, No. 113

(Adj. Sess.), § 173e.